Oklahoma, session 2025, SB343.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2357.411 of Title 68, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this section, “workplace clothing” means


equipment purchased by or procured for an employee that is required


by the employer for safety and protection or to provide for the


capabilities of the employee to perform his or her duties including,


but not limited to, boots with or without steel toes, slip-resistant


shoes, helmets, hard hats, protective eyewear, impact or weather


resistant clothing, insulating materials, high-visibility clothing,


and gloves.



Req. No. 1124 Page 1


B. For tax year 2026 and subsequent tax years, there shall be


allowed a credit against the tax imposed by Section 2355 of Title 68


of the Oklahoma Statutes for employees required to wear workplace


clothing in the performance of their job duties in an amount equal


to the cost of any required workplace clothing, not to exceed One


Hundred Dollars ($100.00) in any tax year.


C. If the credit allowed pursuant to this section exceeds the


tax imposed by Section 2355 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes,


the excess amount shall be refunded to the taxpayer.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1124 QD 1/2/2025 10:44:08 PM

























Req. No. 1124 Page 2